District of Columbia statutes.
1-1021.04

Effective date.

This act shall take effect at the end of the 30-day period provided for the Congressional review of acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in § 1-206.02(c)(1): Provided, however, that no initiative, referendum or recall measure may be initiated as provided in §§ 1-1001.16 and 1-1001.17 until on or after October 1, 1978.

June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 10, 25 DCR 9454
“This act,” referenced in this section is the Initiative, Referendum and Recall Procedures Act of 1979, effective June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1.
1973 Ed., § 1-1119.3.
1981 Ed., § 1-1326.